Texas, session 892, HB212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 45.003(b-1), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (b-1)  The ballot proposition under Subsection (b) must include: (1)  the following statement: "THIS IS A PROPERTY TAX INCREASE."; and (2)  the percentage of students in the district who were required to take the mathematics and reading assessment instruments administered under Section 39.023(a) during the most recent school year and performed satisfactorily on those assessment instruments. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.